South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4928.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-375.  A hospital immediately must report to the Director of the Department of Environmental Services and the Director of the Department Public Health upon providing treatment or services to a patient diagnosed with an infection caused by Naegleria fowleri including, but not limited to, primary amoebic meningoencephalitis. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----